Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202610-133
Bonds of municipal corporation or political subdivision; fiscal and consultant fees; how paid.

Any county, city, village, municipal county, school district, public power district, public power and irrigation district, airport authority, community improvement district, sanitary and improvement district, or any other municipal corporation or political subdivision is hereby authorized to pay fiscal and consultant fees incurred with respect to issuance and sale of any bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness out of the proceeds from the sale of such bonds or any other funds available to the issuer, and such payment shall not constitute or be considered as a discount with respect to the sale price of the bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness.

Laws 1977, LB 265, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 23;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 62.
April 17, 2026